Illinois, session 104th, HB3090.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by changing Sections 514A-15, 14A-30, 14A-35, and 18-8.15 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/14A-15)7    Sec. 14A-15. Purpose. The purpose of this Article is to 8provide encouragement, assistance, and guidance to school 9districts in the development and improvement of educational 10programs for gifted and talented children and children 11eligible for accelerated placement as defined in Sections 1214A-20 and 14A-17 of this Code. School districts shall 13continue to have the authority and flexibility to design 14education programs for gifted and talented children in 15response to community needs, but these programs must comply 16with the requirements established in Section 14A-30 of this 17Code by no later than September 1, 2006 in order to merit 18approval by the State Board of Education in order to qualify 19for State funding for the education of gifted and talented 20children, should such funding become available.21(Source: P.A. 100-421, eff. 7-1-18.) 22    (105 ILCS 5/14A-30)  HB3090- 2 -LRB104 09171 LNS 19227 b1    Sec. 14A-30. Local Funding of local gifted education 2programs. A local program for the education of gifted and 3talented children may include, but need not be limited to, be 4approved for funding by the State Board of Education, pursuant 5to a request for proposals process, if funds for that purpose 6are available and, beginning with the beginning of the 72010-2011 academic year, if the local program submits an 8application for funds that includes a comprehensive plan (i) 9showing that the applicant is capable of meeting a portion of 10the following requirements, (ii) showing the program elements 11currently in place and a timeline for implementation of other 12elements, and (iii) demonstrating to the satisfaction of the 13State Board of Education that the applicant is capable of 14implementing a program of gifted education consistent with 15this Article:16        (1) The use of assessment instruments, such as 17    nonverbal ability tests and tests in students' native 18    languages, and a selection process that is equitable to 19    and inclusive of underrepresented groups, including 20    low-income students, minority students, students with 21    disabilities, twice-exceptional students, and English 22    learners.23        (2) (Blank). A priority emphasis on language arts and 24    mathematics.25        (3) The use of multiple valid assessments that assess 26    both demonstrated achievement and potential for   HB3090- 3 -LRB104 09171 LNS 19227 b1    achievement, including cognitive ability tests and general 2    or subject specific achievement tests, applied universally 3    to all students, and appropriate for the content focus of 4    the gifted services that will be provided. School 5    districts and schools may add other local, valid 6    assessments, such as portfolios. Assessments and selection 7    processes must ensure multiple pathways into the program.8        (4) The use of score ranges on assessments that are 9    appropriate for the school or district population, 10    including the use of local norms for achievement to 11    identify high potential students.12        (5) A process of identification of gifted and talented 13    children that is of equal rigor in each area of aptitude 14    addressed by the program.15        (6) The use of identification procedures that 16    appropriately correspond with the planned programs, 17    curricula, and services.18        (7) A fair and equitable decision-making process.19        (8) The availability of a fair and impartial appeal 20    process within the school, school district, or cooperative 21    of school districts operating a program for parents or 22    guardians whose children are aggrieved by a decision of 23    the school, school district, or cooperative of school 24    districts regarding eligibility for participation in a 25    program.26        (9) Procedures for annually informing the community   HB3090- 4 -LRB104 09171 LNS 19227 b1    at-large, including parents, about the program and the 2    methods used for the identification of gifted and talented 3    children.4        (10) Procedures for notifying parents or guardians of 5    a child of a decision affecting that child's participation 6    in a program.7        (11) A description of how gifted and talented children 8    will be grouped and instructed in order to maximize the 9    educational benefits the children derive from 10    participation in the program, including curriculum 11    modifications and options that accelerate and add depth 12    and complexity to the curriculum content.13        (12) An explanation of how the program emphasizes 14    higher-level skills attainment, including 15    problem-solving, critical thinking, creative thinking, and 16    research skills, as embedded within relevant content 17    areas.18        (13) A methodology for measuring academic growth for 19    gifted and talented children and a procedure for 20    communicating a child's progress to his or her parents or 21    guardian, including, but not limited to, a report card.22        (14) The collection of data on growth in learning for 23    children in a program for gifted and talented children and 24    the reporting of the data to the State Board of Education.25        (15) The designation of a supervisor responsible for 26    overseeing the educational program for gifted and talented   HB3090- 5 -LRB104 09171 LNS 19227 b1    children.2        (16) A showing that the certified teachers who are 3    assigned to teach gifted and talented children understand 4    the characteristics and educational needs of children and 5    are able to differentiate the curriculum and apply 6    instructional methods to meet the needs of the children.7        (17) Plans for the continuation of professional 8    development for staff assigned to the program serving 9    gifted and talented children.10(Source: P.A. 99-706, eff. 7-29-16.) 11    (105 ILCS 5/14A-35)12    Sec. 14A-35. Administrative functions of the State Board 13of Education for gifted and talented children programs. 14    (a) The State Board of Education must designate a staff 15person who shall be in charge of educational programs for 16gifted and talented children. This staff person shall, at a 17minimum, (i) be responsible for developing an approval process 18for educational programs for gifted and talented children by 19no later than September 1, 2006, (ii) receive and maintain the 20written descriptions of all programs for gifted and talented 21children in the State, (iii) collect and maintain the annual 22growth in learning data submitted by a school, school 23district, or cooperative of school districts, (iv) identify 24potential funding sources for the education of gifted and 25talented children, and (v) serve as the main contact person at   HB3090- 6 -LRB104 09171 LNS 19227 b1the State Board of Education for program supervisors and other 2school officials, parents, and other stakeholders regarding 3the education of gifted and talented children.4    (b) Subject to the availability of funds for these 5purposes, the State Board of Education may perform a variety 6of additional administrative functions with respect to the 7education of gifted and talented children, including, but not 8limited to, supervision, quality assurance, compliance 9monitoring, and oversight of local programs, analysis of 10performance outcome data submitted by local educational 11agencies, the establishment of personnel standards, and a 12program of personnel development for teachers and 13administrative personnel in the education of gifted and 14talented children. 15(Source: P.A. 100-421, eff. 7-1-18.) 16    (105 ILCS 5/18-8.15)17    Sec. 18-8.15. Evidence-Based Funding for student success 18for the 2017-2018 and subsequent school years. 19    (a) General provisions. 20        (1) The purpose of this Section is to ensure that, by 21    June 30, 2027 and beyond, this State has a kindergarten 22    through grade 12 public education system with the capacity 23    to ensure the educational development of all persons to 24    the limits of their capacities in accordance with Section 25    1 of Article X of the Constitution of the State of   HB3090- 7 -LRB104 09171 LNS 19227 b1    Illinois. To accomplish that objective, this Section 2    creates a method of funding public education that is 3    evidence-based; is sufficient to ensure every student 4    receives a meaningful opportunity to learn irrespective of 5    race, ethnicity, sexual orientation, gender, or 6    community-income level; and is sustainable and 7    predictable. When fully funded under this Section, every 8    school shall have the resources, based on what the 9    evidence indicates is needed, to: 10            (A) provide all students with a high quality 11        education that offers the academic, enrichment, social 12        and emotional support, technical, and career-focused 13        programs that will allow them to become competitive 14        workers, responsible parents, productive citizens of 15        this State, and active members of our national 16        democracy;17            (B) ensure all students receive the education they 18        need to graduate from high school with the skills 19        required to pursue post-secondary education and 20        training for a rewarding career;21            (C) reduce, with a goal of eliminating, the 22        achievement gap between at-risk and non-at-risk 23        students by raising the performance of at-risk 24        students and not by reducing standards; and25            (D) ensure this State satisfies its obligation to 26        assume the primary responsibility to fund public   HB3090- 8 -LRB104 09171 LNS 19227 b1        education and simultaneously relieve the 2        disproportionate burden placed on local property taxes 3        to fund schools. 4        (2) The Evidence-Based Funding formula under this 5    Section shall be applied to all Organizational Units in 6    this State. The Evidence-Based Funding formula outlined in 7    this Act is based on the formula outlined in Senate Bill 1 8    of the 100th General Assembly, as passed by both 9    legislative chambers. As further defined and described in 10    this Section, there are 4 major components of the 11    Evidence-Based Funding model: 12            (A) First, the model calculates a unique Adequacy 13        Target for each Organizational Unit in this State that 14        considers the costs to implement research-based 15        activities, the unit's student demographics, and 16        regional wage differences.17            (B) Second, the model calculates each 18        Organizational Unit's Local Capacity, or the amount 19        each Organizational Unit is assumed to contribute 20        toward its Adequacy Target from local resources.21            (C) Third, the model calculates how much funding 22        the State currently contributes to the Organizational 23        Unit and adds that to the unit's Local Capacity to 24        determine the unit's overall current adequacy of 25        funding.26            (D) Finally, the model's distribution method   HB3090- 9 -LRB104 09171 LNS 19227 b1        allocates new State funding to those Organizational 2        Units that are least well-funded, considering both 3        Local Capacity and State funding, in relation to their 4        Adequacy Target. 5        (3) An Organizational Unit receiving any funding under 6    this Section may apply those funds to any fund so received 7    for which that Organizational Unit is authorized to make 8    expenditures by law.9        (4) As used in this Section, the following terms shall 10    have the meanings ascribed in this paragraph (4): 11        "Adequacy Target" is defined in paragraph (1) of 12    subsection (b) of this Section.13        "Adjusted EAV" is defined in paragraph (4) of 14    subsection (d) of this Section. 15        "Adjusted Local Capacity Target" is defined in 16    paragraph (3) of subsection (c) of this Section.17        "Adjusted Operating Tax Rate" means a tax rate for all 18    Organizational Units, for which the State Superintendent 19    shall calculate and subtract for the Operating Tax Rate a 20    transportation rate based on total expenses for 21    transportation services under this Code, as reported on 22    the most recent Annual Financial Report in Pupil 23    Transportation Services, function 2550 in both the 24    Education and Transportation funds and functions 4110 and 25    4120 in the Transportation fund, less any corresponding 26    fiscal year State of Illinois scheduled payments excluding   HB3090- 10 -LRB104 09171 LNS 19227 b1    net adjustments for prior years for regular, vocational, 2    or special education transportation reimbursement pursuant 3    to Section 29-5 or subsection (b) of Section 14-13.01 of 4    this Code divided by the Adjusted EAV. If an 5    Organizational Unit's corresponding fiscal year State of 6    Illinois scheduled payments excluding net adjustments for 7    prior years for regular, vocational, or special education 8    transportation reimbursement pursuant to Section 29-5 or 9    subsection (b) of Section 14-13.01 of this Code exceed the 10    total transportation expenses, as defined in this 11    paragraph, no transportation rate shall be subtracted from 12    the Operating Tax Rate. 13        "Allocation Rate" is defined in paragraph (3) of 14    subsection (g) of this Section.15        "Alternative School" means a public school that is 16    created and operated by a regional superintendent of 17    schools and approved by the State Board.18        "Applicable Tax Rate" is defined in paragraph (1) of 19    subsection (d) of this Section.20        "Assessment" means any of those benchmark, progress 21    monitoring, formative, diagnostic, and other assessments, 22    in addition to the State accountability assessment, that 23    assist teachers' needs in understanding the skills and 24    meeting the needs of the students they serve.25        "Assistant principal" means a school administrator 26    duly endorsed to be employed as an assistant principal in   HB3090- 11 -LRB104 09171 LNS 19227 b1    this State.2        "At-risk student" means a student who is at risk of 3    not meeting the Illinois Learning Standards or not 4    graduating from elementary or high school and who 5    demonstrates a need for vocational support or social 6    services beyond that provided by the regular school 7    program. All students included in an Organizational Unit's 8    Low-Income Count, as well as all English learner and 9    disabled students attending the Organizational Unit, shall 10    be considered at-risk students under this Section.11        "Average Student Enrollment" or "ASE" for fiscal year 12    2018 means, for an Organizational Unit, the greater of the 13    average number of students (grades K through 12) reported 14    to the State Board as enrolled in the Organizational Unit 15    on October 1 in the immediately preceding school year, 16    plus the pre-kindergarten students who receive special 17    education services of 2 or more hours a day as reported to 18    the State Board on December 1 in the immediately preceding 19    school year, or the average number of students (grades K 20    through 12) reported to the State Board as enrolled in the 21    Organizational Unit on October 1, plus the 22    pre-kindergarten students who receive special education 23    services of 2 or more hours a day as reported to the State 24    Board on December 1, for each of the immediately preceding 25    3 school years. For fiscal year 2019 and each subsequent 26    fiscal year, "Average Student Enrollment" or "ASE" means,   HB3090- 12 -LRB104 09171 LNS 19227 b1    for an Organizational Unit, the greater of the average 2    number of students (grades K through 12) reported to the 3    State Board as enrolled in the Organizational Unit on 4    October 1 and March 1 in the immediately preceding school 5    year, plus the pre-kindergarten students who receive 6    special education services as reported to the State Board 7    on October 1 and March 1 in the immediately preceding 8    school year, or the average number of students (grades K 9    through 12) reported to the State Board as enrolled in the 10    Organizational Unit on October 1 and March 1, plus the 11    pre-kindergarten students who receive special education 12    services as reported to the State Board on October 1 and 13    March 1, for each of the immediately preceding 3 school 14    years. For the purposes of this definition, "enrolled in 15    the Organizational Unit" means the number of students 16    reported to the State Board who are enrolled in schools 17    within the Organizational Unit that the student attends or 18    would attend if not placed or transferred to another 19    school or program to receive needed services. For the 20    purposes of calculating "ASE", all students, grades K 21    through 12, excluding those attending kindergarten for a 22    half day and students attending an alternative education 23    program operated by a regional office of education or 24    intermediate service center, shall be counted as 1.0. All 25    students attending kindergarten for a half day shall be 26    counted as 0.5, unless in 2017 by June 15 or by March 1 in   HB3090- 13 -LRB104 09171 LNS 19227 b1    subsequent years, the school district reports to the State 2    Board of Education the intent to implement full-day 3    kindergarten district-wide for all students, then all 4    students attending kindergarten shall be counted as 1.0. 5    Special education pre-kindergarten students shall be 6    counted as 0.5 each. If the State Board does not collect or 7    has not collected both an October 1 and March 1 enrollment 8    count by grade or a December 1 collection of special 9    education pre-kindergarten students as of August 31, 2017 10    (the effective date of Public Act 100-465), it shall 11    establish such collection for all future years. For any 12    year in which a count by grade level was collected only 13    once, that count shall be used as the single count 14    available for computing a 3-year average ASE. Funding for 15    programs operated by a regional office of education or an 16    intermediate service center must be calculated using the 17    Evidence-Based Funding formula under this Section for the 18    2019-2020 school year and each subsequent school year 19    until separate adequacy formulas are developed and adopted 20    for each type of program. ASE for a program operated by a 21    regional office of education or an intermediate service 22    center must be determined by the March 1 enrollment for 23    the program. For the 2019-2020 school year, the ASE used 24    in the calculation must be the first-year ASE and, in that 25    year only, the assignment of students served by a regional 26    office of education or intermediate service center shall   HB3090- 14 -LRB104 09171 LNS 19227 b1    not result in a reduction of the March enrollment for any 2    school district. For the 2020-2021 school year, the ASE 3    must be the greater of the current-year ASE or the 2-year 4    average ASE. Beginning with the 2021-2022 school year, the 5    ASE must be the greater of the current-year ASE or the 6    3-year average ASE. School districts shall submit the data 7    for the ASE calculation to the State Board within 45 days 8    of the dates required in this Section for submission of 9    enrollment data in order for it to be included in the ASE 10    calculation. For fiscal year 2018 only, the ASE 11    calculation shall include only enrollment taken on October 12    1. In recognition of the impact of COVID-19, the 13    definition of "Average Student Enrollment" or "ASE" shall 14    be adjusted for calculations under this Section for fiscal 15    years 2022 through 2024. For fiscal years 2022 through 16    2024, the enrollment used in the calculation of ASE 17    representing the 2020-2021 school year shall be the 18    greater of the enrollment for the 2020-2021 school year or 19    the 2019-2020 school year.20        "Base Funding Guarantee" is defined in paragraph (10) 21    of subsection (g) of this Section. 22        "Base Funding Minimum" is defined in subsection (e) of 23    this Section.24        "Base Tax Year" means the property tax levy year used 25    to calculate the Budget Year allocation of primary State 26    aid.  HB3090- 15 -LRB104 09171 LNS 19227 b1        "Base Tax Year's Extension" means the product of the 2    equalized assessed valuation utilized by the county clerk 3    in the Base Tax Year multiplied by the limiting rate as 4    calculated by the county clerk and defined in PTELL.5        "Bilingual Education Allocation" means the amount of 6    an Organizational Unit's final Adequacy Target 7    attributable to bilingual education divided by the 8    Organizational Unit's final Adequacy Target, the product 9    of which shall be multiplied by the amount of new funding 10    received pursuant to this Section. An Organizational 11    Unit's final Adequacy Target attributable to bilingual 12    education shall include all additional investments in 13    English learner students' adequacy elements.14        "Budget Year" means the school year for which primary 15    State aid is calculated and awarded under this Section. 16        "Central office" means individual administrators and 17    support service personnel charged with managing the 18    instructional programs, business and operations, and 19    security of the Organizational Unit.20        "Comparable Wage Index" or "CWI" means a regional cost 21    differentiation metric that measures systemic, regional 22    variations in the salaries of college graduates who are 23    not educators. The CWI utilized for this Section shall, 24    for the first 3 years of Evidence-Based Funding 25    implementation, be the CWI initially developed by the 26    National Center for Education Statistics, as most recently   HB3090- 16 -LRB104 09171 LNS 19227 b1    updated by Texas A & M University. In the fourth and 2    subsequent years of Evidence-Based Funding implementation, 3    the State Superintendent shall re-determine the CWI using 4    a similar methodology to that identified in the Texas A & M 5    University study, with adjustments made no less frequently 6    than once every 5 years.7        "Computer technology and equipment" means computers 8    servers, notebooks, network equipment, copiers, printers, 9    instructional software, security software, curriculum 10    management courseware, and other similar materials and 11    equipment. 12        "Computer technology and equipment investment 13    allocation" means the final Adequacy Target amount of an 14    Organizational Unit assigned to Tier 1 or Tier 2 in the 15    prior school year attributable to the additional $285.50 16    per student computer technology and equipment investment 17    grant divided by the Organizational Unit's final Adequacy 18    Target, the result of which shall be multiplied by the 19    amount of new funding received pursuant to this Section. 20    An Organizational Unit assigned to a Tier 1 or Tier 2 final 21    Adequacy Target attributable to the received computer 22    technology and equipment investment grant shall include 23    all additional investments in computer technology and 24    equipment adequacy elements. 25        "Core subject" means mathematics; science; reading, 26    English, writing, and language arts; history and social   HB3090- 17 -LRB104 09171 LNS 19227 b1    studies; world languages; and subjects taught as Advanced 2    Placement in high schools.3        "Core teacher" means a regular classroom teacher in 4    elementary schools and teachers of a core subject in 5    middle and high schools.6        "Core Intervention teacher (tutor)" means a licensed 7    teacher providing one-on-one or small group tutoring to 8    students struggling to meet proficiency in core subjects.9        "CPPRT" means corporate personal property replacement 10    tax funds paid to an Organizational Unit during the 11    calendar year one year before the calendar year in which a 12    school year begins, pursuant to "An Act in relation to the 13    abolition of ad valorem personal property tax and the 14    replacement of revenues lost thereby, and amending and 15    repealing certain Acts and parts of Acts in connection 16    therewith", certified August 14, 1979, as amended (Public 17    Act 81-1st S.S.-1).18        "EAV" means equalized assessed valuation as defined in 19    paragraph (2) of subsection (d) of this Section and 20    calculated in accordance with paragraph (3) of subsection 21    (d) of this Section.22        "ECI" means the Bureau of Labor Statistics' national 23    employment cost index for civilian workers in educational 24    services in elementary and secondary schools on a 25    cumulative basis for the 12-month calendar year preceding 26    the fiscal year of the Evidence-Based Funding calculation.  HB3090- 18 -LRB104 09171 LNS 19227 b1        "EIS Data" means the employment information system 2    data maintained by the State Board on educators within 3    Organizational Units.4        "Employee benefits" means health, dental, and vision 5    insurance offered to employees of an Organizational Unit, 6    the costs associated with the statutorily required payment 7    of the normal cost of the Organizational Unit's teacher 8    pensions, Social Security employer contributions, and 9    Illinois Municipal Retirement Fund employer contributions.10        "English learner" or "EL" means a child included in 11    the definition of "English learners" under Section 14C-2 12    of this Code participating in a program of transitional 13    bilingual education or a transitional program of 14    instruction meeting the requirements and program 15    application procedures of Article 14C of this Code. For 16    the purposes of collecting the number of EL students 17    enrolled, the same collection and calculation methodology 18    as defined above for "ASE" shall apply to English 19    learners, with the exception that EL student enrollment 20    shall include students in grades pre-kindergarten through 21    12.22        "Essential Elements" means those elements, resources, 23    and educational programs that have been identified through 24    academic research as necessary to improve student success, 25    improve academic performance, close achievement gaps, and 26    provide for other per student costs related to the   HB3090- 19 -LRB104 09171 LNS 19227 b1    delivery and leadership of the Organizational Unit, as 2    well as the maintenance and operations of the unit, and 3    which are specified in paragraph (2) of subsection (b) of 4    this Section.5        "Evidence-Based Funding" means State funding provided 6    to an Organizational Unit pursuant to this Section.7        "Extended day" means academic and enrichment programs 8    provided to students outside the regular school day before 9    and after school or during non-instructional times during 10    the school day.11        "Extension Limitation Ratio" means a numerical ratio 12    in which the numerator is the Base Tax Year's Extension 13    and the denominator is the Preceding Tax Year's Extension.14        "Final Percent of Adequacy" is defined in paragraph 15    (4) of subsection (f) of this Section.16        "Final Resources" is defined in paragraph (3) of 17    subsection (f) of this Section.18        "Full-time equivalent" or "FTE" means the full-time 19    equivalency compensation for staffing the relevant 20    position at an Organizational Unit.21        "Funding Gap" is defined in paragraph (1) of 22    subsection (g).23        "Hybrid District" means a partial elementary unit 24    district created pursuant to Article 11E of this Code.25        "Instructional assistant" means a core or special 26    education, non-licensed employee who assists a teacher in   HB3090- 20 -LRB104 09171 LNS 19227 b1    the classroom and provides academic support to students. 2        "Instructional facilitator" means a qualified teacher 3    or licensed teacher leader who facilitates and coaches 4    continuous improvement in classroom instruction; provides 5    instructional support to teachers in the elements of 6    research-based instruction or demonstrates the alignment 7    of instruction with curriculum standards and assessment 8    tools; develops or coordinates instructional programs or 9    strategies; develops and implements training; chooses 10    standards-based instructional materials; provides 11    teachers with an understanding of current research; serves 12    as a mentor, site coach, curriculum specialist, or lead 13    teacher; or otherwise works with fellow teachers, in 14    collaboration, to use data to improve instructional 15    practice or develop model lessons.16        "Instructional materials" means relevant 17    instructional materials for student instruction, 18    including, but not limited to, textbooks, consumable 19    workbooks, laboratory equipment, library books, and other 20    similar materials.21        "Laboratory School" means a public school that is 22    created and operated by a public university and approved 23    by the State Board.24        "Librarian" means a teacher with an endorsement as a 25    library information specialist or another individual whose 26    primary responsibility is overseeing library resources   HB3090- 21 -LRB104 09171 LNS 19227 b1    within an Organizational Unit.2        "Limiting rate for Hybrid Districts" means the 3    combined elementary school and high school limiting rates. 4        "Local Capacity" is defined in paragraph (1) of 5    subsection (c) of this Section.6        "Local Capacity Percentage" is defined in subparagraph 7    (A) of paragraph (2) of subsection (c) of this Section.8        "Local Capacity Ratio" is defined in subparagraph (B) 9    of paragraph (2) of subsection (c) of this Section.10        "Local Capacity Target" is defined in paragraph (2) of 11    subsection (c) of this Section.12        "Low-Income Count" means, for an Organizational Unit 13    in a fiscal year, the higher of the average number of 14    students for the prior school year or the immediately 15    preceding 3 school years who, as of July 1 of the 16    immediately preceding fiscal year (as determined by the 17    Department of Human Services), are eligible for at least 18    one of the following low-income programs: Medicaid, the 19    Children's Health Insurance Program, Temporary Assistance 20    for Needy Families (TANF), or the Supplemental Nutrition 21    Assistance Program, excluding pupils who are eligible for 22    services provided by the Department of Children and Family 23    Services. Until such time that grade level low-income 24    populations become available, grade level low-income 25    populations shall be determined by applying the low-income 26    percentage to total student enrollments by grade level.   HB3090- 22 -LRB104 09171 LNS 19227 b1    The low-income percentage is determined by dividing the 2    Low-Income Count by the Average Student Enrollment. The 3    low-income percentage for a regional office of education 4    or an intermediate service center operating one or more 5    alternative education programs must be set to the weighted 6    average of the low-income percentages of all of the school 7    districts in the service region. The weighted low-income 8    percentage is the result of multiplying the low-income 9    percentage of each school district served by the regional 10    office of education or intermediate service center by each 11    school district's Average Student Enrollment, summarizing 12    those products and dividing the total by the total Average 13    Student Enrollment for the service region.14        "Maintenance and operations" means custodial services, 15    facility and ground maintenance, facility operations, 16    facility security, routine facility repairs, and other 17    similar services and functions.18        "Minimum Funding Level" is defined in paragraph (9) of 19    subsection (g) of this Section.20        "New Property Tax Relief Pool Funds" means, for any 21    given fiscal year, all State funds appropriated under 22    Section 2-3.170 of this Code. 23        "New State Funds" means, for a given school year, all 24    State funds appropriated for Evidence-Based Funding in 25    excess of the amount needed to fund the Base Funding 26    Minimum for all Organizational Units in that school year.  HB3090- 23 -LRB104 09171 LNS 19227 b1        "Nurse" means an individual licensed as a certified 2    school nurse, in accordance with the rules established for 3    nursing services by the State Board, who is an employee of 4    and is available to provide health care-related services 5    for students of an Organizational Unit.6        "Operating Tax Rate" means the rate utilized in the 7    previous year to extend property taxes for all purposes, 8    except Bond and Interest, Summer School, Rent, Capital 9    Improvement, and Vocational Education Building purposes. 10    For Hybrid Districts, the Operating Tax Rate shall be the 11    combined elementary and high school rates utilized in the 12    previous year to extend property taxes for all purposes, 13    except Bond and Interest, Summer School, Rent, Capital 14    Improvement, and Vocational Education Building purposes. 15        "Organizational Unit" means a Laboratory School or any 16    public school district that is recognized as such by the 17    State Board and that contains elementary schools typically 18    serving kindergarten through 5th grades, middle schools 19    typically serving 6th through 8th grades, high schools 20    typically serving 9th through 12th grades, a program 21    established under Section 2-3.66 or 2-3.41, or a program 22    operated by a regional office of education or an 23    intermediate service center under Article 13A or 13B. The 24    General Assembly acknowledges that the actual grade levels 25    served by a particular Organizational Unit may vary 26    slightly from what is typical.  HB3090- 24 -LRB104 09171 LNS 19227 b1        "Organizational Unit CWI" is determined by calculating 2    the CWI in the region and original county in which an 3    Organizational Unit's primary administrative office is 4    located as set forth in this paragraph, provided that if 5    the Organizational Unit CWI as calculated in accordance 6    with this paragraph is less than 0.9, the Organizational 7    Unit CWI shall be increased to 0.9. Each county's current 8    CWI value shall be adjusted based on the CWI value of that 9    county's neighboring Illinois counties, to create a 10    "weighted adjusted index value". This shall be calculated 11    by summing the CWI values of all of a county's adjacent 12    Illinois counties and dividing by the number of adjacent 13    Illinois counties, then taking the weighted value of the 14    original county's CWI value and the adjacent Illinois 15    county average. To calculate this weighted value, if the 16    number of adjacent Illinois counties is greater than 2, 17    the original county's CWI value will be weighted at 0.25 18    and the adjacent Illinois county average will be weighted 19    at 0.75. If the number of adjacent Illinois counties is 2, 20    the original county's CWI value will be weighted at 0.33 21    and the adjacent Illinois county average will be weighted 22    at 0.66. The greater of the county's current CWI value and 23    its weighted adjusted index value shall be used as the 24    Organizational Unit CWI.25        "Preceding Tax Year" means the property tax levy year 26    immediately preceding the Base Tax Year.  HB3090- 25 -LRB104 09171 LNS 19227 b1        "Preceding Tax Year's Extension" means the product of 2    the equalized assessed valuation utilized by the county 3    clerk in the Preceding Tax Year multiplied by the 4    Operating Tax Rate. 5        "Preliminary Percent of Adequacy" is defined in 6    paragraph (2) of subsection (f) of this Section.7        "Preliminary Resources" is defined in paragraph (2) of 8    subsection (f) of this Section.9        "Principal" means a school administrator duly endorsed 10    to be employed as a principal in this State.11        "Professional development" means training programs for 12    licensed staff in schools, including, but not limited to, 13    programs that assist in implementing new curriculum 14    programs, provide data focused or academic assessment data 15    training to help staff identify a student's weaknesses and 16    strengths, target interventions, improve instruction, 17    encompass instructional strategies for English learner, 18    gifted, or at-risk students, address inclusivity, cultural 19    sensitivity, or implicit bias, or otherwise provide 20    professional support for licensed staff.21        "Prototypical" means 450 special education 22    pre-kindergarten and kindergarten through grade 5 students 23    for an elementary school, 450 grade 6 through 8 students 24    for a middle school, and 600 grade 9 through 12 students 25    for a high school.26        "PTELL" means the Property Tax Extension Limitation   HB3090- 26 -LRB104 09171 LNS 19227 b1    Law.2        "PTELL EAV" is defined in paragraph (4) of subsection 3    (d) of this Section.4        "Pupil support staff" means a nurse, psychologist, 5    social worker, family liaison personnel, or other staff 6    member who provides support to at-risk or struggling 7    students.8        "Real Receipts" is defined in paragraph (1) of 9    subsection (d) of this Section.10        "Regionalization Factor" means, for a particular 11    Organizational Unit, the figure derived by dividing the 12    Organizational Unit CWI by the Statewide Weighted CWI.13        "School counselor" means a licensed school counselor 14    who provides guidance and counseling support for students 15    within an Organizational Unit.16        "School site staff" means the primary school secretary 17    and any additional clerical personnel assigned to a 18    school.19        "Special education" means special educational 20    facilities and services, as defined in Section 14-1.08 of 21    this Code.22        "Special Education Allocation" means the amount of an 23    Organizational Unit's final Adequacy Target attributable 24    to special education divided by the Organizational Unit's 25    final Adequacy Target, the product of which shall be 26    multiplied by the amount of new funding received pursuant   HB3090- 27 -LRB104 09171 LNS 19227 b1    to this Section. An Organizational Unit's final Adequacy 2    Target attributable to special education shall include all 3    special education investment adequacy elements. 4        "Specialist teacher" means a teacher who provides 5    instruction in subject areas not included in core 6    subjects, including, but not limited to, art, music, 7    physical education, health, driver education, 8    career-technical education, and such other subject areas 9    as may be mandated by State law or provided by an 10    Organizational Unit.11        "Specially Funded Unit" means an Alternative School, 12    safe school, Department of Juvenile Justice school, 13    special education cooperative or entity recognized by the 14    State Board as a special education cooperative, 15    State-approved charter school, or alternative learning 16    opportunities program that received direct funding from 17    the State Board during the 2016-2017 school year through 18    any of the funding sources included within the calculation 19    of the Base Funding Minimum or Glenwood Academy.20        "Supplemental Grant Funding" means supplemental 21    general State aid funding received by an Organizational 22    Unit during the 2016-2017 school year pursuant to 23    subsection (H) of Section 18-8.05 of this Code (now 24    repealed). 25        "State Adequacy Level" is the sum of the Adequacy 26    Targets of all Organizational Units.  HB3090- 28 -LRB104 09171 LNS 19227 b1        "State Board" means the State Board of Education.2        "State Superintendent" means the State Superintendent 3    of Education.4        "Statewide Weighted CWI" means a figure determined by 5    multiplying each Organizational Unit CWI times the ASE for 6    that Organizational Unit creating a weighted value, 7    summing all Organizational Units' weighted values, and 8    dividing by the total ASE of all Organizational Units, 9    thereby creating an average weighted index.10        "Student activities" means non-credit producing 11    after-school programs, including, but not limited to, 12    clubs, bands, sports, and other activities authorized by 13    the school board of the Organizational Unit.14        "Substitute teacher" means an individual teacher or 15    teaching assistant who is employed by an Organizational 16    Unit and is temporarily serving the Organizational Unit on 17    a per diem or per period-assignment basis to replace 18    another staff member.19        "Summer school" means academic and enrichment programs 20    provided to students during the summer months outside of 21    the regular school year.22        "Supervisory aide" means a non-licensed staff member 23    who helps in supervising students of an Organizational 24    Unit, but does so outside of the classroom, in situations 25    such as, but not limited to, monitoring hallways and 26    playgrounds, supervising lunchrooms, or supervising   HB3090- 29 -LRB104 09171 LNS 19227 b1    students when being transported in buses serving the 2    Organizational Unit.3        "Target Ratio" is defined in paragraph (4) of 4    subsection (g).5        "Tier 1", "Tier 2", "Tier 3", and "Tier 4" are defined 6    in paragraph (3) of subsection (g).7        "Tier 1 Aggregate Funding", "Tier 2 Aggregate 8    Funding", "Tier 3 Aggregate Funding", and "Tier 4 9    Aggregate Funding" are defined in paragraph (1) of 10    subsection (g). 11    (b) Adequacy Target calculation. 12        (1) Each Organizational Unit's Adequacy Target is the 13    sum of the Organizational Unit's cost of providing 14    Essential Elements, as calculated in accordance with this 15    subsection (b), with the salary amounts in the Essential 16    Elements multiplied by a Regionalization Factor calculated 17    pursuant to paragraph (3) of this subsection (b).18        (2) The Essential Elements are attributable on a pro 19    rata basis related to defined subgroups of the ASE of each 20    Organizational Unit as specified in this paragraph (2), 21    with investments and FTE positions pro rata funded based 22    on ASE counts in excess of or less than the thresholds set 23    forth in this paragraph (2). The method for calculating 24    attributable pro rata costs and the defined subgroups 25    thereto are as follows: 26            (A) Core class size investments. Each   HB3090- 30 -LRB104 09171 LNS 19227 b1        Organizational Unit shall receive the funding required 2        to support that number of FTE core teacher positions 3        as is needed to keep the respective class sizes of the 4        Organizational Unit to the following maximum numbers:5                (i) For grades kindergarten through 3, the 6            Organizational Unit shall receive funding required 7            to support one FTE core teacher position for every 8            15 Low-Income Count students in those grades and 9            one FTE core teacher position for every 20 10            non-Low-Income Count students in those grades.11                (ii) For grades 4 through 12, the 12            Organizational Unit shall receive funding required 13            to support one FTE core teacher position for every 14            20 Low-Income Count students in those grades and 15            one FTE core teacher position for every 25 16            non-Low-Income Count students in those grades.17            The number of non-Low-Income Count students in a 18        grade shall be determined by subtracting the 19        Low-Income students in that grade from the ASE of the 20        Organizational Unit for that grade.21            (B) Specialist teacher investments. Each 22        Organizational Unit shall receive the funding needed 23        to cover that number of FTE specialist teacher 24        positions that correspond to the following 25        percentages: 26                (i) if the Organizational Unit operates an   HB3090- 31 -LRB104 09171 LNS 19227 b1            elementary or middle school, then 20.00% of the 2            number of the Organizational Unit's core teachers, 3            as determined under subparagraph (A) of this 4            paragraph (2); and5                (ii) if such Organizational Unit operates a 6            high school, then 33.33% of the number of the 7            Organizational Unit's core teachers. 8            (C) Instructional facilitator investments. Each 9        Organizational Unit shall receive the funding needed 10        to cover one FTE instructional facilitator position 11        for every 200 combined ASE of pre-kindergarten 12        children with disabilities and all kindergarten 13        through grade 12 students of the Organizational Unit.14            (D) Core intervention teacher (tutor) investments. 15        Each Organizational Unit shall receive the funding 16        needed to cover one FTE teacher position for each 17        prototypical elementary, middle, and high school.18            (E) Substitute teacher investments. Each 19        Organizational Unit shall receive the funding needed 20        to cover substitute teacher costs that is equal to 21        5.70% of the minimum pupil attendance days required 22        under Section 10-19 of this Code for all full-time 23        equivalent core, specialist, and intervention 24        teachers, school nurses, special education teachers 25        and instructional assistants, instructional 26        facilitators, and summer school and extended day   HB3090- 32 -LRB104 09171 LNS 19227 b1        teacher positions, as determined under this paragraph 2        (2), at a salary rate of 33.33% of the average salary 3        for grade K through 12 teachers and 33.33% of the 4        average salary of each instructional assistant 5        position.6            (F) Core school counselor investments. Each 7        Organizational Unit shall receive the funding needed 8        to cover one FTE school counselor for each 450 9        combined ASE of pre-kindergarten children with 10        disabilities and all kindergarten through grade 5 11        students, plus one FTE school counselor for each 250 12        grades 6 through 8 ASE middle school students, plus 13        one FTE school counselor for each 250 grades 9 through 14        12 ASE high school students.15            (G) Nurse investments. Each Organizational Unit 16        shall receive the funding needed to cover one FTE 17        nurse for each 750 combined ASE of pre-kindergarten 18        children with disabilities and all kindergarten 19        through grade 12 students across all grade levels it 20        serves.21            (H) Supervisory aide investments. Each 22        Organizational Unit shall receive the funding needed 23        to cover one FTE for each 225 combined ASE of 24        pre-kindergarten children with disabilities and all 25        kindergarten through grade 5 students, plus one FTE 26        for each 225 ASE middle school students, plus one FTE   HB3090- 33 -LRB104 09171 LNS 19227 b1        for each 200 ASE high school students.2            (I) Librarian investments. Each Organizational 3        Unit shall receive the funding needed to cover one FTE 4        librarian for each prototypical elementary school, 5        middle school, and high school and one FTE aide or 6        media technician for every 300 combined ASE of 7        pre-kindergarten children with disabilities and all 8        kindergarten through grade 12 students.9            (J) Principal investments. Each Organizational 10        Unit shall receive the funding needed to cover one FTE 11        principal position for each prototypical elementary 12        school, plus one FTE principal position for each 13        prototypical middle school, plus one FTE principal 14        position for each prototypical high school.15            (K) Assistant principal investments. Each 16        Organizational Unit shall receive the funding needed 17        to cover one FTE assistant principal position for each 18        prototypical elementary school, plus one FTE assistant 19        principal position for each prototypical middle 20        school, plus one FTE assistant principal position for 21        each prototypical high school.22            (L) School site staff investments. Each 23        Organizational Unit shall receive the funding needed 24        for one FTE position for each 225 ASE of 25        pre-kindergarten children with disabilities and all 26        kindergarten through grade 5 students, plus one FTE   HB3090- 34 -LRB104 09171 LNS 19227 b1        position for each 225 ASE middle school students, plus 2        one FTE position for each 200 ASE high school 3        students.4            (M) Advanced academic program Gifted investments. 5        Each Organizational Unit shall receive $40 per 6        kindergarten through grade 12 ASE for advanced 7        academic programs as defined in Section 14A-17.8            (N) Professional development investments. Each 9        Organizational Unit shall receive $125 per student of 10        the combined ASE of pre-kindergarten children with 11        disabilities and all kindergarten through grade 12 12        students for trainers and other professional 13        development-related expenses for supplies and 14        materials.15            (O) Instructional material investments. Each 16        Organizational Unit shall receive $190 per student of 17        the combined ASE of pre-kindergarten children with 18        disabilities and all kindergarten through grade 12 19        students to cover instructional material costs.20            (P) Assessment investments. Each Organizational 21        Unit shall receive $25 per student of the combined ASE 22        of pre-kindergarten children with disabilities and all 23        kindergarten through grade 12 students to cover 24        assessment costs.25            (Q) Computer technology and equipment investments. 26        Each Organizational Unit shall receive $285.50 per   HB3090- 35 -LRB104 09171 LNS 19227 b1        student of the combined ASE of pre-kindergarten 2        children with disabilities and all kindergarten 3        through grade 12 students to cover computer technology 4        and equipment costs. For the 2018-2019 school year and 5        subsequent school years, Organizational Units assigned 6        to Tier 1 and Tier 2 in the prior school year shall 7        receive an additional $285.50 per student of the 8        combined ASE of pre-kindergarten children with 9        disabilities and all kindergarten through grade 12 10        students to cover computer technology and equipment 11        costs in the Organizational Unit's Adequacy Target. 12        The State Board may establish additional requirements 13        for Organizational Unit expenditures of funds received 14        pursuant to this subparagraph (Q), including a 15        requirement that funds received pursuant to this 16        subparagraph (Q) may be used only for serving the 17        technology needs of the district. It is the intent of 18        Public Act 100-465 that all Tier 1 and Tier 2 districts 19        receive the addition to their Adequacy Target in the 20        following year, subject to compliance with the 21        requirements of the State Board.22            (R) Student activities investments. Each 23        Organizational Unit shall receive the following 24        funding amounts to cover student activities: $100 per 25        kindergarten through grade 5 ASE student in elementary 26        school, plus $200 per ASE student in middle school,   HB3090- 36 -LRB104 09171 LNS 19227 b1        plus $675 per ASE student in high school.2            (S) Maintenance and operations investments. Each 3        Organizational Unit shall receive $1,038 per student 4        of the combined ASE of pre-kindergarten children with 5        disabilities and all kindergarten through grade 12 6        students for day-to-day maintenance and operations 7        expenditures, including salary, supplies, and 8        materials, as well as purchased services, but 9        excluding employee benefits. The proportion of salary 10        for the application of a Regionalization Factor and 11        the calculation of benefits is equal to $352.92.12            (T) Central office investments. Each 13        Organizational Unit shall receive $742 per student of 14        the combined ASE of pre-kindergarten children with 15        disabilities and all kindergarten through grade 12 16        students to cover central office operations, including 17        administrators and classified personnel charged with 18        managing the instructional programs, business and 19        operations of the school district, and security 20        personnel. The proportion of salary for the 21        application of a Regionalization Factor and the 22        calculation of benefits is equal to $368.48.23            (U) Employee benefit investments. Each 24        Organizational Unit shall receive 30% of the total of 25        all salary-calculated elements of the Adequacy Target, 26        excluding substitute teachers and student activities   HB3090- 37 -LRB104 09171 LNS 19227 b1        investments, to cover benefit costs. For central 2        office and maintenance and operations investments, the 3        benefit calculation shall be based upon the salary 4        proportion of each investment. If at any time the 5        responsibility for funding the employer normal cost of 6        teacher pensions is assigned to school districts, then 7        that amount certified by the Teachers' Retirement 8        System of the State of Illinois to be paid by the 9        Organizational Unit for the preceding school year 10        shall be added to the benefit investment. For any 11        fiscal year in which a school district organized under 12        Article 34 of this Code is responsible for paying the 13        employer normal cost of teacher pensions, then that 14        amount of its employer normal cost plus the amount for 15        retiree health insurance as certified by the Public 16        School Teachers' Pension and Retirement Fund of 17        Chicago to be paid by the school district for the 18        preceding school year that is statutorily required to 19        cover employer normal costs and the amount for retiree 20        health insurance shall be added to the 30% specified 21        in this subparagraph (U). The Teachers' Retirement 22        System of the State of Illinois and the Public School 23        Teachers' Pension and Retirement Fund of Chicago shall 24        submit such information as the State Superintendent 25        may require for the calculations set forth in this 26        subparagraph (U).   HB3090- 38 -LRB104 09171 LNS 19227 b1            (V) Additional investments in low-income students. 2        In addition to and not in lieu of all other funding 3        under this paragraph (2), each Organizational Unit 4        shall receive funding based on the average teacher 5        salary for grades K through 12 to cover the costs of:6                (i) one FTE intervention teacher (tutor) 7            position for every 125 Low-Income Count students;8                (ii) one FTE pupil support staff position for 9            every 125 Low-Income Count students;10                (iii) one FTE extended day teacher position 11            for every 120 Low-Income Count students; and12                (iv) one FTE summer school teacher position 13            for every 120 Low-Income Count students.14            (W) Additional investments in English learner 15        students. In addition to and not in lieu of all other 16        funding under this paragraph (2), each Organizational 17        Unit shall receive funding based on the average 18        teacher salary for grades K through 12 to cover the 19        costs of: 20                (i) one FTE intervention teacher (tutor) 21            position for every 125 English learner students;22                (ii) one FTE pupil support staff position for 23            every 125 English learner students;24                (iii) one FTE extended day teacher position 25            for every 120 English learner students;26                (iv) one FTE summer school teacher position   HB3090- 39 -LRB104 09171 LNS 19227 b1            for every 120 English learner students; and2                (v) one FTE core teacher position for every 3            100 English learner students. 4            (X) Special education investments. Each 5        Organizational Unit shall receive funding based on the 6        average teacher salary for grades K through 12 to 7        cover special education as follows: 8                (i) one FTE teacher position for every 141 9            combined ASE of pre-kindergarten children with 10            disabilities and all kindergarten through grade 12 11            students;12                (ii) one FTE instructional assistant for every 13            141 combined ASE of pre-kindergarten children with 14            disabilities and all kindergarten through grade 12 15            students; and16                (iii) one FTE psychologist position for every 17            1,000 combined ASE of pre-kindergarten children 18            with disabilities and all kindergarten through 19            grade 12 students. 20        (3) For calculating the salaries included within the 21    Essential Elements, the State Superintendent shall 22    annually calculate average salaries to the nearest dollar 23    using the employment information system data maintained by 24    the State Board, limited to public schools only and 25    excluding special education and vocational cooperatives, 26    schools operated by the Department of Juvenile Justice,   HB3090- 40 -LRB104 09171 LNS 19227 b1    and charter schools, for the following positions: 2            (A) Teacher for grades K through 8.3            (B) Teacher for grades 9 through 12.4            (C) Teacher for grades K through 12.5            (D) School counselor for grades K through 8.6            (E) School counselor for grades 9 through 12.7            (F) School counselor for grades K through 12.8            (G) Social worker.9            (H) Psychologist.10            (I) Librarian.11            (J) Nurse.12            (K) Principal.13            (L) Assistant principal. 14        For the purposes of this paragraph (3), "teacher" 15    includes core teachers, specialist and elective teachers, 16    instructional facilitators, tutors, special education 17    teachers, pupil support staff teachers, English learner 18    teachers, extended day teachers, and summer school 19    teachers. Where specific grade data is not required for 20    the Essential Elements, the average salary for 21    corresponding positions shall apply. For substitute 22    teachers, the average teacher salary for grades K through 23    12 shall apply. 24        For calculating the salaries included within the 25    Essential Elements for positions not included within EIS 26    Data, the following salaries shall be used in the first   HB3090- 41 -LRB104 09171 LNS 19227 b1    year of implementation of Evidence-Based Funding: 2            (i) school site staff, $30,000; and3            (ii) non-instructional assistant, instructional 4        assistant, library aide, library media tech, or 5        supervisory aide: $25,000. 6        In the second and subsequent years of implementation 7    of Evidence-Based Funding, the amounts in items (i) and 8    (ii) of this paragraph (3) shall annually increase by the 9    ECI. 10        The salary amounts for the Essential Elements 11    determined pursuant to subparagraphs (A) through (L), (S) 12    and (T), and (V) through (X) of paragraph (2) of 13    subsection (b) of this Section shall be multiplied by a 14    Regionalization Factor. 15    (c) Local Capacity calculation. 16        (1) Each Organizational Unit's Local Capacity 17    represents an amount of funding it is assumed to 18    contribute toward its Adequacy Target for purposes of the 19    Evidence-Based Funding formula calculation. "Local 20    Capacity" means either (i) the Organizational Unit's Local 21    Capacity Target as calculated in accordance with paragraph 22    (2) of this subsection (c) if its Real Receipts are equal 23    to or less than its Local Capacity Target or (ii) the 24    Organizational Unit's Adjusted Local Capacity, as 25    calculated in accordance with paragraph (3) of this 26    subsection (c) if Real Receipts are more than its Local   HB3090- 42 -LRB104 09171 LNS 19227 b1    Capacity Target.2        (2) "Local Capacity Target" means, for an 3    Organizational Unit, that dollar amount that is obtained 4    by multiplying its Adequacy Target by its Local Capacity 5    Ratio. 6            (A) An Organizational Unit's Local Capacity 7        Percentage is the conversion of the Organizational 8        Unit's Local Capacity Ratio, as such ratio is 9        determined in accordance with subparagraph (B) of this 10        paragraph (2), into a cumulative distribution 11        resulting in a percentile ranking to determine each 12        Organizational Unit's relative position to all other 13        Organizational Units in this State. The calculation of 14        Local Capacity Percentage is described in subparagraph 15        (C) of this paragraph (2).16            (B) An Organizational Unit's Local Capacity Ratio 17        in a given year is the percentage obtained by dividing 18        its Adjusted EAV or PTELL EAV, whichever is less, by 19        its Adequacy Target, with the resulting ratio further 20        adjusted as follows: 21                (i) for Organizational Units serving grades 22            kindergarten through 12 and Hybrid Districts, no 23            further adjustments shall be made;24                (ii) for Organizational Units serving grades 25            kindergarten through 8, the ratio shall be 26            multiplied by 9/13;  HB3090- 43 -LRB104 09171 LNS 19227 b1                (iii) for Organizational Units serving grades 2            9 through 12, the Local Capacity Ratio shall be 3            multiplied by 4/13; and4                (iv) for an Organizational Unit with a 5            different grade configuration than those specified 6            in items (i) through (iii) of this subparagraph 7            (B), the State Superintendent shall determine a 8            comparable adjustment based on the grades served. 9            (C) The Local Capacity Percentage is equal to the 10        percentile ranking of the district. Local Capacity 11        Percentage converts each Organizational Unit's Local 12        Capacity Ratio to a cumulative distribution resulting 13        in a percentile ranking to determine each 14        Organizational Unit's relative position to all other 15        Organizational Units in this State. The Local Capacity 16        Percentage cumulative distribution resulting in a 17        percentile ranking for each Organizational Unit shall 18        be calculated using the standard normal distribution 19        of the score in relation to the weighted mean and 20        weighted standard deviation and Local Capacity Ratios 21        of all Organizational Units. If the value assigned to 22        any Organizational Unit is in excess of 90%, the value 23        shall be adjusted to 90%. For Laboratory Schools, the 24        Local Capacity Percentage shall be set at 10% in 25        recognition of the absence of EAV and resources from 26        the public university that are allocated to the   HB3090- 44 -LRB104 09171 LNS 19227 b1        Laboratory School. For a regional office of education 2        or an intermediate service center operating one or 3        more alternative education programs, the Local 4        Capacity Percentage must be set at 10% in recognition 5        of the absence of EAV and resources from school 6        districts that are allocated to the regional office of 7        education or intermediate service center. The weighted 8        mean for the Local Capacity Percentage shall be 9        determined by multiplying each Organizational Unit's 10        Local Capacity Ratio times the ASE for the unit 11        creating a weighted value, summing the weighted values 12        of all Organizational Units, and dividing by the total 13        ASE of all Organizational Units. The weighted standard 14        deviation shall be determined by taking the square 15        root of the weighted variance of all Organizational 16        Units' Local Capacity Ratio, where the variance is 17        calculated by squaring the difference between each 18        unit's Local Capacity Ratio and the weighted mean, 19        then multiplying the variance for each unit times the 20        ASE for the unit to create a weighted variance for each 21        unit, then summing all units' weighted variance and 22        dividing by the total ASE of all units.23            (D) For any Organizational Unit, the 24        Organizational Unit's Adjusted Local Capacity Target 25        shall be reduced by either (i) the school board's 26        remaining contribution pursuant to paragraph (ii) of   HB3090- 45 -LRB104 09171 LNS 19227 b1        subsection (b-4) of Section 16-158 of the Illinois 2        Pension Code in a given year or (ii) the board of 3        education's remaining contribution pursuant to 4        paragraph (iv) of subsection (b) of Section 17-129 of 5        the Illinois Pension Code absent the employer normal 6        cost portion of the required contribution and amount 7        allowed pursuant to subdivision (3) of Section 8        17-142.1 of the Illinois Pension Code in a given year. 9        In the preceding sentence, item (i) shall be certified 10        to the State Board of Education by the Teachers' 11        Retirement System of the State of Illinois and item 12        (ii) shall be certified to the State Board of 13        Education by the Public School Teachers' Pension and 14        Retirement Fund of the City of Chicago. 15        (3) If an Organizational Unit's Real Receipts are more 16    than its Local Capacity Target, then its Local Capacity 17    shall equal an Adjusted Local Capacity Target as 18    calculated in accordance with this paragraph (3). The 19    Adjusted Local Capacity Target is calculated as the sum of 20    the Organizational Unit's Local Capacity Target and its 21    Real Receipts Adjustment. The Real Receipts Adjustment 22    equals the Organizational Unit's Real Receipts less its 23    Local Capacity Target, with the resulting figure 24    multiplied by the Local Capacity Percentage.25        As used in this paragraph (3), "Real Percent of 26    Adequacy" means the sum of an Organizational Unit's Real   HB3090- 46 -LRB104 09171 LNS 19227 b1    Receipts, CPPRT, and Base Funding Minimum, with the 2    resulting figure divided by the Organizational Unit's 3    Adequacy Target. 4    (d) Calculation of Real Receipts, EAV, and Adjusted EAV 5for purposes of the Local Capacity calculation. 6        (1) An Organizational Unit's Real Receipts are the 7    product of its Applicable Tax Rate and its Adjusted EAV. 8    An Organizational Unit's Applicable Tax Rate is its 9    Adjusted Operating Tax Rate for property within the 10    Organizational Unit.11        (2) The State Superintendent shall calculate the 12    equalized assessed valuation, or EAV, of all taxable 13    property of each Organizational Unit as of September 30 of 14    the previous year in accordance with paragraph (3) of this 15    subsection (d). The State Superintendent shall then 16    determine the Adjusted EAV of each Organizational Unit in 17    accordance with paragraph (4) of this subsection (d), 18    which Adjusted EAV figure shall be used for the purposes 19    of calculating Local Capacity.20        (3) To calculate Real Receipts and EAV, the Department 21    of Revenue shall supply to the State Superintendent the 22    value as equalized or assessed by the Department of 23    Revenue of all taxable property of every Organizational 24    Unit, together with (i) the applicable tax rate used in 25    extending taxes for the funds of the Organizational Unit 26    as of September 30 of the previous year and (ii) the   HB3090- 47 -LRB104 09171 LNS 19227 b1    limiting rate for all Organizational Units subject to 2    property tax extension limitations as imposed under PTELL. 3            (A) The Department of Revenue shall add to the 4        equalized assessed value of all taxable property of 5        each Organizational Unit situated entirely or 6        partially within a county that is or was subject to the 7        provisions of Section 15-176 or 15-177 of the Property 8        Tax Code (i) an amount equal to the total amount by 9        which the homestead exemption allowed under Section 10        15-176 or 15-177 of the Property Tax Code for real 11        property situated in that Organizational Unit exceeds 12        the total amount that would have been allowed in that 13        Organizational Unit if the maximum reduction under 14        Section 15-176 was (I) $4,500 in Cook County or $3,500 15        in all other counties in tax year 2003 or (II) $5,000 16        in all counties in tax year 2004 and thereafter and 17        (ii) an amount equal to the aggregate amount for the 18        taxable year of all additional exemptions under 19        Section 15-175 of the Property Tax Code for owners 20        with a household income of $30,000 or less. The county 21        clerk of any county that is or was subject to the 22        provisions of Section 15-176 or 15-177 of the Property 23        Tax Code shall annually calculate and certify to the 24        Department of Revenue for each Organizational Unit all 25        homestead exemption amounts under Section 15-176 or 26        15-177 of the Property Tax Code and all amounts of   HB3090- 48 -LRB104 09171 LNS 19227 b1        additional exemptions under Section 15-175 of the 2        Property Tax Code for owners with a household income 3        of $30,000 or less. It is the intent of this 4        subparagraph (A) that if the general homestead 5        exemption for a parcel of property is determined under 6        Section 15-176 or 15-177 of the Property Tax Code 7        rather than Section 15-175, then the calculation of 8        EAV shall not be affected by the difference, if any, 9        between the amount of the general homestead exemption 10        allowed for that parcel of property under Section 11        15-176 or 15-177 of the Property Tax Code and the 12        amount that would have been allowed had the general 13        homestead exemption for that parcel of property been 14        determined under Section 15-175 of the Property Tax 15        Code. It is further the intent of this subparagraph 16        (A) that if additional exemptions are allowed under 17        Section 15-175 of the Property Tax Code for owners 18        with a household income of less than $30,000, then the 19        calculation of EAV shall not be affected by the 20        difference, if any, because of those additional 21        exemptions.22            (B) With respect to any part of an Organizational 23        Unit within a redevelopment project area in respect to 24        which a municipality has adopted tax increment 25        allocation financing pursuant to the Tax Increment 26        Allocation Redevelopment Act, Division 74.4 of Article   HB3090- 49 -LRB104 09171 LNS 19227 b1        11 of the Illinois Municipal Code, or the Industrial 2        Jobs Recovery Law, Division 74.6 of Article 11 of the 3        Illinois Municipal Code, no part of the current EAV of 4        real property located in any such project area that is 5        attributable to an increase above the total initial 6        EAV of such property shall be used as part of the EAV 7        of the Organizational Unit, until such time as all 8        redevelopment project costs have been paid, as 9        provided in Section 11-74.4-8 of the Tax Increment 10        Allocation Redevelopment Act or in Section 11-74.6-35 11        of the Industrial Jobs Recovery Law. For the purpose 12        of the EAV of the Organizational Unit, the total 13        initial EAV or the current EAV, whichever is lower, 14        shall be used until such time as all redevelopment 15        project costs have been paid.16            (B-5) The real property equalized assessed 17        valuation for a school district shall be adjusted by 18        subtracting from the real property value, as equalized 19        or assessed by the Department of Revenue, for the 20        district an amount computed by dividing the amount of 21        any abatement of taxes under Section 18-170 of the 22        Property Tax Code by 3.00% for a district maintaining 23        grades kindergarten through 12, by 2.30% for a 24        district maintaining grades kindergarten through 8, or 25        by 1.05% for a district maintaining grades 9 through 26        12 and adjusted by an amount computed by dividing the   HB3090- 50 -LRB104 09171 LNS 19227 b1        amount of any abatement of taxes under subsection (a) 2        of Section 18-165 of the Property Tax Code by the same 3        percentage rates for district type as specified in 4        this subparagraph (B-5). 5            (C) For Organizational Units that are Hybrid 6        Districts, the State Superintendent shall use the 7        lesser of the adjusted equalized assessed valuation 8        for property within the partial elementary unit 9        district for elementary purposes, as defined in 10        Article 11E of this Code, or the adjusted equalized 11        assessed valuation for property within the partial 12        elementary unit district for high school purposes, as 13        defined in Article 11E of this Code. 14            (D) If a school district's boundaries span 15        multiple counties, then the Department of Revenue 16        shall send to the State Board, for the purposes of 17        calculating Evidence-Based Funding, the limiting rate 18        and individual rates by purpose for the county that 19        contains the majority of the school district's 20        equalized assessed valuation. 21        (4) An Organizational Unit's Adjusted EAV shall be the 22    average of its EAV over the immediately preceding 3 years 23    or the lesser of its EAV in the immediately preceding year 24    or the average of its EAV over the immediately preceding 3 25    years if the EAV in the immediately preceding year has 26    declined by 10% or more when comparing the 2 most recent   HB3090- 51 -LRB104 09171 LNS 19227 b1    years. In the event of Organizational Unit reorganization, 2    consolidation, or annexation, the Organizational Unit's 3    Adjusted EAV for the first 3 years after such change shall 4    be as follows: the most current EAV shall be used in the 5    first year, the average of a 2-year EAV or its EAV in the 6    immediately preceding year if the EAV declines by 10% or 7    more when comparing the 2 most recent years for the second 8    year, and the lesser of a 3-year average EAV or its EAV in 9    the immediately preceding year if the Adjusted EAV 10    declines by 10% or more when comparing the 2 most recent 11    years for the third year. For any school district whose 12    EAV in the immediately preceding year is used in 13    calculations, in the following year, the Adjusted EAV 14    shall be the average of its EAV over the immediately 15    preceding 2 years or the immediately preceding year if 16    that year represents a decline of 10% or more when 17    comparing the 2 most recent years. 18        "PTELL EAV" means a figure calculated by the State 19    Board for Organizational Units subject to PTELL as 20    described in this paragraph (4) for the purposes of 21    calculating an Organizational Unit's Local Capacity Ratio. 22    Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph (4), the 23    PTELL EAV of an Organizational Unit shall be equal to the 24    product of the equalized assessed valuation last used in 25    the calculation of general State aid under Section 18-8.05 26    of this Code (now repealed) or Evidence-Based Funding   HB3090- 52 -LRB104 09171 LNS 19227 b1    under this Section and the Organizational Unit's Extension 2    Limitation Ratio. If an Organizational Unit has approved 3    or does approve an increase in its limiting rate, pursuant 4    to Section 18-190 of the Property Tax Code, affecting the 5    Base Tax Year, the PTELL EAV shall be equal to the product 6    of the equalized assessed valuation last used in the 7    calculation of general State aid under Section 18-8.05 of 8    this Code (now repealed) or Evidence-Based Funding under 9    this Section multiplied by an amount equal to one plus the 10    percentage increase, if any, in the Consumer Price Index 11    for All Urban Consumers for all items published by the 12    United States Department of Labor for the 12-month 13    calendar year preceding the Base Tax Year, plus the 14    equalized assessed valuation of new property, annexed 15    property, and recovered tax increment value and minus the 16    equalized assessed valuation of disconnected property.17        As used in this paragraph (4), "new property" and 18    "recovered tax increment value" shall have the meanings 19    set forth in the Property Tax Extension Limitation Law.20    (e) Base Funding Minimum calculation. 21        (1) For the 2017-2018 school year, the Base Funding 22    Minimum of an Organizational Unit or a Specially Funded 23    Unit shall be the amount of State funds distributed to the 24    Organizational Unit or Specially Funded Unit during the 25    2016-2017 school year prior to any adjustments and 26    specified appropriation amounts described in this   HB3090- 53 -LRB104 09171 LNS 19227 b1    paragraph (1) from the following Sections, as calculated 2    by the State Superintendent: Section 18-8.05 of this Code 3    (now repealed); Section 5 of Article 224 of Public Act 4    99-524 (equity grants); Section 14-7.02b of this Code 5    (funding for children requiring special education 6    services); Section 14-13.01 of this Code (special 7    education facilities and staffing), except for 8    reimbursement of the cost of transportation pursuant to 9    Section 14-13.01; Section 14C-12 of this Code (English 10    learners); and Section 18-4.3 of this Code (summer 11    school), based on an appropriation level of $13,121,600. 12    For a school district organized under Article 34 of this 13    Code, the Base Funding Minimum also includes (i) the funds 14    allocated to the school district pursuant to Section 1D-1 15    of this Code attributable to funding programs authorized 16    by the Sections of this Code listed in the preceding 17    sentence and (ii) the difference between (I) the funds 18    allocated to the school district pursuant to Section 1D-1 19    of this Code attributable to the funding programs 20    authorized by Section 14-7.02 (non-public special 21    education reimbursement), subsection (b) of Section 22    14-13.01 (special education transportation), Section 29-5 23    (transportation), Section 2-3.80 (agricultural 24    education), Section 2-3.66 (truants' alternative 25    education), Section 2-3.62 (educational service centers), 26    and Section 14-7.03 (special education - orphanage) of   HB3090- 54 -LRB104 09171 LNS 19227 b1    this Code and Section 15 of the Childhood Hunger Relief 2    Act (free breakfast program) and (II) the school 3    district's actual expenditures for its non-public special 4    education, special education transportation, 5    transportation programs, agricultural education, truants' 6    alternative education, services that would otherwise be 7    performed by a regional office of education, special 8    education orphanage expenditures, and free breakfast, as 9    most recently calculated and reported pursuant to 10    subsection (f) of Section 1D-1 of this Code. The Base 11    Funding Minimum for Glenwood Academy shall be $952,014. 12    For programs operated by a regional office of education or 13    an intermediate service center, the Base Funding Minimum 14    must be the total amount of State funds allocated to those 15    programs in the 2018-2019 school year and amounts provided 16    pursuant to Article 34 of Public Act 100-586 and Section 17    3-16 of this Code. All programs established after June 5, 18    2019 (the effective date of Public Act 101-10) and 19    administered by a regional office of education or an 20    intermediate service center must have an initial Base 21    Funding Minimum set to an amount equal to the first-year 22    ASE multiplied by the amount of per pupil funding received 23    in the previous school year by the lowest funded similar 24    existing program type. If the enrollment for a program 25    operated by a regional office of education or an 26    intermediate service center is zero, then it may not   HB3090- 55 -LRB104 09171 LNS 19227 b1    receive Base Funding Minimum funds for that program in the 2    next fiscal year, and those funds must be distributed to 3    Organizational Units under subsection (g).4        (2) For the 2018-2019 and subsequent school years, the 5    Base Funding Minimum of Organizational Units and Specially 6    Funded Units shall be the sum of (i) the amount of 7    Evidence-Based Funding for the prior school year, (ii) the 8    Base Funding Minimum for the prior school year, and (iii) 9    any amount received by a school district pursuant to 10    Section 7 of Article 97 of Public Act 100-21. 11        For the 2022-2023 school year, the Base Funding 12    Minimum of Organizational Units shall be the amounts 13    recalculated by the State Board of Education for Fiscal 14    Year 2019 through Fiscal Year 2022 that were necessary due 15    to average student enrollment errors for districts 16    organized under Article 34 of this Code, plus the Fiscal 17    Year 2022 property tax relief grants provided under 18    Section 2-3.170 of this Code, ensuring each Organizational 19    Unit has the correct amount of resources for Fiscal Year 20    2023 Evidence-Based Funding calculations and that Fiscal 21    Year 2023 Evidence-Based Funding Distributions are made in 22    accordance with this Section. 23        (3) Subject to approval by the General Assembly as 24    provided in this paragraph (3), an Organizational Unit 25    that meets all of the following criteria, as determined by 26    the State Board, shall have District Intervention Money   HB3090- 56 -LRB104 09171 LNS 19227 b1    added to its Base Funding Minimum at the time the Base 2    Funding Minimum is calculated by the State Board: 3            (A) The Organizational Unit is operating under an 4        Independent Authority under Section 2-3.25f-5 of this 5        Code for a minimum of 4 school years or is subject to 6        the control of the State Board pursuant to a court 7        order for a minimum of 4 school years.8            (B) The Organizational Unit was designated as a 9        Tier 1 or Tier 2 Organizational Unit in the previous 10        school year under paragraph (3) of subsection (g) of 11        this Section.12            (C) The Organizational Unit demonstrates 13        sustainability through a 5-year financial and 14        strategic plan.15            (D) The Organizational Unit has made sufficient 16        progress and achieved sufficient stability in the 17        areas of governance, academic growth, and finances. 18        As part of its determination under this paragraph (3), 19    the State Board may consider the Organizational Unit's 20    summative designation, any accreditations of the 21    Organizational Unit, or the Organizational Unit's 22    financial profile, as calculated by the State Board.23        If the State Board determines that an Organizational 24    Unit has met the criteria set forth in this paragraph (3), 25    it must submit a report to the General Assembly, no later 26    than January 2 of the fiscal year in which the State Board   HB3090- 57 -LRB104 09171 LNS 19227 b1    makes it determination, on the amount of District 2    Intervention Money to add to the Organizational Unit's 3    Base Funding Minimum. The General Assembly must review the 4    State Board's report and may approve or disapprove, by 5    joint resolution, the addition of District Intervention 6    Money. If the General Assembly fails to act on the report 7    within 40 calendar days from the receipt of the report, 8    the addition of District Intervention Money is deemed 9    approved. If the General Assembly approves the amount of 10    District Intervention Money to be added to the 11    Organizational Unit's Base Funding Minimum, the District 12    Intervention Money must be added to the Base Funding 13    Minimum annually thereafter.14        For the first 4 years following the initial year that 15    the State Board determines that an Organizational Unit has 16    met the criteria set forth in this paragraph (3) and has 17    received funding under this Section, the Organizational 18    Unit must annually submit to the State Board, on or before 19    November 30, a progress report regarding its financial and 20    strategic plan under subparagraph (C) of this paragraph 21    (3). The plan shall include the financial data from the 22    past 4 annual financial reports or financial audits that 23    must be presented to the State Board by November 15 of each 24    year and the approved budget financial data for the 25    current year. The plan shall be developed according to the 26    guidelines presented to the Organizational Unit by the   HB3090- 58 -LRB104 09171 LNS 19227 b1    State Board. The plan shall further include financial 2    projections for the next 3 fiscal years and include a 3    discussion and financial summary of the Organizational 4    Unit's facility needs. If the Organizational Unit does not 5    demonstrate sufficient progress toward its 5-year plan or 6    if it has failed to file an annual financial report, an 7    annual budget, a financial plan, a deficit reduction plan, 8    or other financial information as required by law, the 9    State Board may establish a Financial Oversight Panel 10    under Article 1H of this Code. However, if the 11    Organizational Unit already has a Financial Oversight 12    Panel, the State Board may extend the duration of the 13    Panel. 14    (f) Percent of Adequacy and Final Resources calculation. 15        (1) The Evidence-Based Funding formula establishes a 16    Percent of Adequacy for each Organizational Unit in order 17    to place such units into tiers for the purposes of the 18    funding distribution system described in subsection (g) of 19    this Section. Initially, an Organizational Unit's 20    Preliminary Resources and Preliminary Percent of Adequacy 21    are calculated pursuant to paragraph (2) of this 22    subsection (f). Then, an Organizational Unit's Final 23    Resources and Final Percent of Adequacy are calculated to 24    account for the Organizational Unit's poverty 25    concentration levels pursuant to paragraphs (3) and (4) of 26    this subsection (f).  HB3090- 59 -LRB104 09171 LNS 19227 b1        (2) An Organizational Unit's Preliminary Resources are 2    equal to the sum of its Local Capacity Target, CPPRT, and 3    Base Funding Minimum. An Organizational Unit's Preliminary 4    Percent of Adequacy is the lesser of (i) its Preliminary 5    Resources divided by its Adequacy Target or (ii) 100%.6        (3) Except for Specially Funded Units, an 7    Organizational Unit's Final Resources are equal to the sum 8    of its Local Capacity, CPPRT, and Adjusted Base Funding 9    Minimum. The Base Funding Minimum of each Specially Funded 10    Unit shall serve as its Final Resources, except that the 11    Base Funding Minimum for State-approved charter schools 12    shall not include any portion of general State aid 13    allocated in the prior year based on the per capita 14    tuition charge times the charter school enrollment.15        (4) An Organizational Unit's Final Percent of Adequacy 16    is its Final Resources divided by its Adequacy Target. An 17    Organizational Unit's Adjusted Base Funding Minimum is 18    equal to its Base Funding Minimum less its Supplemental 19    Grant Funding, with the resulting figure added to the 20    product of its Supplemental Grant Funding and Preliminary 21    Percent of Adequacy. 22    (g) Evidence-Based Funding formula distribution system. 23        (1) In each school year under the Evidence-Based 24    Funding formula, each Organizational Unit receives funding 25    equal to the sum of its Base Funding Minimum and the unit's 26    allocation of New State Funds determined pursuant to this   HB3090- 60 -LRB104 09171 LNS 19227 b1    subsection (g). To allocate New State Funds, the 2    Evidence-Based Funding formula distribution system first 3    places all Organizational Units into one of 4 tiers in 4    accordance with paragraph (3) of this subsection (g), 5    based on the Organizational Unit's Final Percent of 6    Adequacy. New State Funds are allocated to each of the 4 7    tiers as follows: Tier 1 Aggregate Funding equals 50% of 8    all New State Funds, Tier 2 Aggregate Funding equals 49% 9    of all New State Funds, Tier 3 Aggregate Funding equals 10    0.9% of all New State Funds, and Tier 4 Aggregate Funding 11    equals 0.1% of all New State Funds. Each Organizational 12    Unit within Tier 1 or Tier 2 receives an allocation of New 13    State Funds equal to its tier Funding Gap, as defined in 14    the following sentence, multiplied by the tier's 15    Allocation Rate determined pursuant to paragraph (4) of 16    this subsection (g). For Tier 1, an Organizational Unit's 17    Funding Gap equals the tier's Target Ratio, as specified 18    in paragraph (5) of this subsection (g), multiplied by the 19    Organizational Unit's Adequacy Target, with the resulting 20    amount reduced by the Organizational Unit's Final 21    Resources. For Tier 2, an Organizational Unit's Funding 22    Gap equals the tier's Target Ratio, as described in 23    paragraph (5) of this subsection (g), multiplied by the 24    Organizational Unit's Adequacy Target, with the resulting 25    amount reduced by the Organizational Unit's Final 26    Resources and its Tier 1 funding allocation. To determine   HB3090- 61 -LRB104 09171 LNS 19227 b1    the Organizational Unit's Funding Gap, the resulting 2    amount is then multiplied by a factor equal to one minus 3    the Organizational Unit's Local Capacity Target 4    percentage. Each Organizational Unit within Tier 3 or Tier 5    4 receives an allocation of New State Funds equal to the 6    product of its Adequacy Target and the tier's Allocation 7    Rate, as specified in paragraph (4) of this subsection 8    (g).9        (2) To ensure equitable distribution of dollars for 10    all Tier 2 Organizational Units, no Tier 2 Organizational 11    Unit shall receive fewer dollars per ASE than any Tier 3 12    Organizational Unit. Each Tier 2 and Tier 3 Organizational 13    Unit shall have its funding allocation divided by its ASE. 14    Any Tier 2 Organizational Unit with a funding allocation 15    per ASE below the greatest Tier 3 allocation per ASE shall 16    get a funding allocation equal to the greatest Tier 3 17    funding allocation per ASE multiplied by the 18    Organizational Unit's ASE. Each Tier 2 Organizational 19    Unit's Tier 2 funding allocation shall be multiplied by 20    the percentage calculated by dividing the original Tier 2 21    Aggregate Funding by the sum of all Tier 2 Organizational 22    Units' Tier 2 funding allocation after adjusting 23    districts' funding below Tier 3 levels. 24        (3) Organizational Units are placed into one of 4 25    tiers as follows: 26            (A) Tier 1 consists of all Organizational Units,   HB3090- 62 -LRB104 09171 LNS 19227 b1        except for Specially Funded Units, with a Percent of 2        Adequacy less than the Tier 1 Target Ratio. The Tier 1 3        Target Ratio is the ratio level that allows for Tier 1 4        Aggregate Funding to be distributed, with the Tier 1 5        Allocation Rate determined pursuant to paragraph (4) 6        of this subsection (g).7            (B) Tier 2 consists of all Tier 1 Units and all 8        other Organizational Units, except for Specially 9        Funded Units, with a Percent of Adequacy of less than 10        0.90.11            (C) Tier 3 consists of all Organizational Units, 12        except for Specially Funded Units, with a Percent of 13        Adequacy of at least 0.90 and less than 1.0.14            (D) Tier 4 consists of all Organizational Units 15        with a Percent of Adequacy of at least 1.0. 16        (4) The Allocation Rates for Tiers 1 through 4 are 17    determined as follows: 18            (A) The Tier 1 Allocation Rate is 30%.19            (B) The Tier 2 Allocation Rate is the result of the 20        following equation: Tier 2 Aggregate Funding, divided 21        by the sum of the Funding Gaps for all Tier 2 22        Organizational Units, unless the result of such 23        equation is higher than 1.0. If the result of such 24        equation is higher than 1.0, then the Tier 2 25        Allocation Rate is 1.0. 26            (C) The Tier 3 Allocation Rate is the result of the   HB3090- 63 -LRB104 09171 LNS 19227 b1        following equation: Tier 3 Aggregate Funding, divided 2        by the sum of the Adequacy Targets of all Tier 3 3        Organizational Units.4            (D) The Tier 4 Allocation Rate is the result of the 5        following equation: Tier 4 Aggregate Funding, divided 6        by the sum of the Adequacy Targets of all Tier 4 7        Organizational Units. 8        (5) A tier's Target Ratio is determined as follows: 9            (A) The Tier 1 Target Ratio is the ratio level that 10        allows for Tier 1 Aggregate Funding to be distributed 11        with the Tier 1 Allocation Rate.12            (B) The Tier 2 Target Ratio is 0.90.13            (C) The Tier 3 Target Ratio is 1.0.14        (6) If, at any point, the Tier 1 Target Ratio is 15    greater than 90%, then all Tier 1 funding shall be 16    allocated to Tier 2 and no Tier 1 Organizational Unit's 17    funding may be identified.18        (7) In the event that all Tier 2 Organizational Units 19    receive funding at the Tier 2 Target Ratio level, any 20    remaining New State Funds shall be allocated to Tier 3 and 21    Tier 4 Organizational Units. 22        (8) If any Specially Funded Units, excluding Glenwood 23    Academy, recognized by the State Board do not qualify for 24    direct funding following the implementation of Public Act 25    100-465 from any of the funding sources included within 26    the definition of Base Funding Minimum, the unqualified   HB3090- 64 -LRB104 09171 LNS 19227 b1    portion of the Base Funding Minimum shall be transferred 2    to one or more appropriate Organizational Units as 3    determined by the State Superintendent based on the prior 4    year ASE of the Organizational Units.5        (8.5) If a school district withdraws from a special 6    education cooperative, the portion of the Base Funding 7    Minimum that is attributable to the school district may be 8    redistributed to the school district upon withdrawal. The 9    school district and the cooperative must include the 10    amount of the Base Funding Minimum that is to be 11    reapportioned in their withdrawal agreement and notify the 12    State Board of the change with a copy of the agreement upon 13    withdrawal. 14        (9) The Minimum Funding Level is intended to establish 15    a target for State funding that will keep pace with 16    inflation and continue to advance equity through the 17    Evidence-Based Funding formula. The target for State 18    funding of New Property Tax Relief Pool Funds is 19    $50,000,000 for State fiscal year 2019 and subsequent 20    State fiscal years. The Minimum Funding Level is equal to 21    $350,000,000. In addition to any New State Funds, no more 22    than $50,000,000 New Property Tax Relief Pool Funds may be 23    counted toward the Minimum Funding Level. If the sum of 24    New State Funds and applicable New Property Tax Relief 25    Pool Funds are less than the Minimum Funding Level, than 26    funding for tiers shall be reduced in the following   HB3090- 65 -LRB104 09171 LNS 19227 b1    manner:2            (A) First, Tier 4 funding shall be reduced by an 3        amount equal to the difference between the Minimum 4        Funding Level and New State Funds until such time as 5        Tier 4 funding is exhausted.6            (B) Next, Tier 3 funding shall be reduced by an 7        amount equal to the difference between the Minimum 8        Funding Level and New State Funds and the reduction in 9        Tier 4 funding until such time as Tier 3 funding is 10        exhausted.11            (C) Next, Tier 2 funding shall be reduced by an 12        amount equal to the difference between the Minimum 13        Funding Level and New State Funds and the reduction in 14        Tier 4 and Tier 3.15            (D) Finally, Tier 1 funding shall be reduced by an 16        amount equal to the difference between the Minimum 17        Funding level and New State Funds and the reduction in 18        Tier 2, 3, and 4 funding. In addition, the Allocation 19        Rate for Tier 1 shall be reduced to a percentage equal 20        to the Tier 1 Allocation Rate set by paragraph (4) of 21        this subsection (g), multiplied by the result of New 22        State Funds divided by the Minimum Funding Level.23        (9.5) For State fiscal year 2019 and subsequent State 24    fiscal years, if New State Funds exceed $300,000,000, then 25    any amount in excess of $300,000,000 shall be dedicated 26    for purposes of Section 2-3.170 of this Code up to a   HB3090- 66 -LRB104 09171 LNS 19227 b1    maximum of $50,000,000. 2        (10) In the event of a decrease in the amount of the 3    appropriation for this Section in any fiscal year after 4    implementation of this Section, the Organizational Units 5    receiving Tier 1 and Tier 2 funding, as determined under 6    paragraph (3) of this subsection (g), shall be held 7    harmless by establishing a Base Funding Guarantee equal to 8    the per pupil kindergarten through grade 12 funding 9    received in accordance with this Section in the prior 10    fiscal year. Reductions shall be made to the Base Funding 11    Minimum of Organizational Units in Tier 3 and Tier 4 on a 12    per pupil basis equivalent to the total number of the ASE 13    in Tier 3-funded and Tier 4-funded Organizational Units 14    divided by the total reduction in State funding. The Base 15    Funding Minimum as reduced shall continue to be applied to 16    Tier 3 and Tier 4 Organizational Units and adjusted by the 17    relative formula when increases in appropriations for this 18    Section resume. In no event may State funding reductions 19    to Organizational Units in Tier 3 or Tier 4 exceed an 20    amount that would be less than the Base Funding Minimum 21    established in the first year of implementation of this 22    Section. If additional reductions are required, all school 23    districts shall receive a reduction by a per pupil amount 24    equal to the aggregate additional appropriation reduction 25    divided by the total ASE of all Organizational Units. 26        (11) The State Superintendent shall make minor   HB3090- 67 -LRB104 09171 LNS 19227 b1    adjustments to the distribution formula set forth in this 2    subsection (g) to account for the rounding of percentages 3    to the nearest tenth of a percentage and dollar amounts to 4    the nearest whole dollar. 5    (h) State Superintendent administration of funding and 6district submission requirements. 7        (1) The State Superintendent shall, in accordance with 8    appropriations made by the General Assembly, meet the 9    funding obligations created under this Section.10        (2) The State Superintendent shall calculate the 11    Adequacy Target for each Organizational Unit under this 12    Section. No Evidence-Based Funding shall be distributed 13    within an Organizational Unit without the approval of the 14    unit's school board.15        (3) Annually, the State Superintendent shall calculate 16    and report to each Organizational Unit the unit's 17    aggregate financial adequacy amount, which shall be the 18    sum of the Adequacy Target for each Organizational Unit. 19    The State Superintendent shall calculate and report 20    separately for each Organizational Unit the unit's total 21    State funds allocated for its students with disabilities. 22    The State Superintendent shall calculate and report 23    separately for each Organizational Unit the amount of 24    funding and applicable FTE calculated for each Essential 25    Element of the unit's Adequacy Target.26        (4) Annually, the State Superintendent shall calculate   HB3090- 68 -LRB104 09171 LNS 19227 b1    and report to each Organizational Unit the amount the unit 2    must expend on special education and bilingual education 3    and computer technology and equipment for Organizational 4    Units assigned to Tier 1 or Tier 2 that received an 5    additional $285.50 per student computer technology and 6    equipment investment grant to their Adequacy Target 7    pursuant to the unit's Base Funding Minimum, Special 8    Education Allocation, Bilingual Education Allocation, and 9    computer technology and equipment investment allocation.10        (5) Moneys distributed under this Section shall be 11    calculated on a school year basis, but paid on a fiscal 12    year basis, with payments beginning in August and 13    extending through June. Unless otherwise provided, the 14    moneys appropriated for each fiscal year shall be 15    distributed in 22 equal payments at least 2 times monthly 16    to each Organizational Unit. If moneys appropriated for 17    any fiscal year are distributed other than monthly, the 18    distribution shall be on the same basis for each 19    Organizational Unit.20        (6) Any school district that fails, for any given 21    school year, to maintain school as required by law or to 22    maintain a recognized school is not eligible to receive 23    Evidence-Based Funding. In case of non-recognition of one 24    or more attendance centers in a school district otherwise 25    operating recognized schools, the claim of the district 26    shall be reduced in the proportion that the enrollment in   HB3090- 69 -LRB104 09171 LNS 19227 b1    the attendance center or centers bears to the enrollment 2    of the school district. "Recognized school" means any 3    public school that meets the standards for recognition by 4    the State Board. A school district or attendance center 5    not having recognition status at the end of a school term 6    is entitled to receive State aid payments due upon a legal 7    claim that was filed while it was recognized.8        (7) School district claims filed under this Section 9    are subject to Sections 18-9 and 18-12 of this Code, 10    except as otherwise provided in this Section.11        (8) Each fiscal year, the State Superintendent shall 12    calculate for each Organizational Unit an amount of its 13    Base Funding Minimum and Evidence-Based Funding that shall 14    be deemed attributable to the provision of special 15    educational facilities and services, as defined in Section 16    14-1.08 of this Code, in a manner that ensures compliance 17    with maintenance of State financial support requirements 18    under the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education 19    Act. An Organizational Unit must use such funds only for 20    the provision of special educational facilities and 21    services, as defined in Section 14-1.08 of this Code, and 22    must comply with any expenditure verification procedures 23    adopted by the State Board.24        (9) All Organizational Units in this State must submit 25    annual spending plans, as part of the budget submission 26    process, no later than October 31 of each year to the State   HB3090- 70 -LRB104 09171 LNS 19227 b1    Board. The spending plan shall describe how each 2    Organizational Unit will utilize the Base Funding Minimum 3    and Evidence-Based Funding it receives from this State 4    under this Section with specific identification of the 5    intended utilization of Low-Income, English learner, and 6    special education resources. Additionally, the annual 7    spending plans of each Organizational Unit shall describe 8    how the Organizational Unit expects to achieve student 9    growth and how the Organizational Unit will achieve State 10    education goals, as defined by the State Board, and shall 11    indicate which stakeholder groups the Organizational Unit 12    engaged with to inform its annual spending plans. The 13    State Superintendent may, from time to time, identify 14    additional requisites for Organizational Units to satisfy 15    when compiling the annual spending plans required under 16    this subsection (h). The format and scope of annual 17    spending plans shall be developed by the State 18    Superintendent and the State Board of Education. School 19    districts that serve students under Article 14C of this 20    Code shall continue to submit information as required 21    under Section 14C-12 of this Code. Annual spending plans 22    required under this subsection (h) shall be integrated 23    into annual school district budgets completed pursuant to 24    Section 17-1 or Section 34-43. Organizational Units that 25    do not submit a budget to the State Board shall be provided 26    with a separate planning template developed by the State   HB3090- 71 -LRB104 09171 LNS 19227 b1    Board. The State Board shall create an Evidence-Based 2    Funding spending plan tool to make Evidence-Based Funding 3    spending plan data for each Organizational Unit available 4    on the State Board's website no later than December 31, 5    2025, with annual updates thereafter. The tool shall allow 6    for the selection and review of each Organizational Unit's 7    planned use of Evidence-Based Funding.8        (10) No later than January 1, 2018, the State 9    Superintendent shall develop a 5-year strategic plan for 10    all Organizational Units to help in planning for adequacy 11    funding under this Section. The State Superintendent shall 12    submit the plan to the Governor and the General Assembly, 13    as provided in Section 3.1 of the General Assembly 14    Organization Act. The plan shall include recommendations 15    for: 16            (A) a framework for collaborative, professional, 17        innovative, and 21st century learning environments 18        using the Evidence-Based Funding model;19            (B) ways to prepare and support this State's 20        educators for successful instructional careers;21            (C) application and enhancement of the current 22        financial accountability measures, the approved State 23        plan to comply with the federal Every Student Succeeds 24        Act, and the Illinois Balanced Accountability Measures 25        in relation to student growth and elements of the 26        Evidence-Based Funding model; and  HB3090- 72 -LRB104 09171 LNS 19227 b1            (D) implementation of an effective school adequacy 2        funding system based on projected and recommended 3        funding levels from the General Assembly. 4        (11) On an annual basis, the State Superintendent must 5    recalibrate all of the following per pupil elements of the 6    Adequacy Target and applied to the formulas, based on the 7    study of average expenses and as reported in the most 8    recent annual financial report:9            (A) Gifted under subparagraph (M) of paragraph (2) 10        of subsection (b).11            (B) Instructional materials under subparagraph (O) 12        of paragraph (2) of subsection (b).13            (C) Assessment under subparagraph (P) of paragraph 14        (2) of subsection (b).15            (D) Student activities under subparagraph (R) of 16        paragraph (2) of subsection (b).17            (E) Maintenance and operations under subparagraph 18        (S) of paragraph (2) of subsection (b).19            (F) Central office under subparagraph (T) of 20        paragraph (2) of subsection (b). 21    (i) Professional Review Panel. 22        (1) A Professional Review Panel is created to study 23    and review topics related to the implementation and effect 24    of Evidence-Based Funding, as assigned by a joint 25    resolution or Public Act of the General Assembly or a 26    motion passed by the State Board of Education. The Panel   HB3090- 73 -LRB104 09171 LNS 19227 b1    must provide recommendations to and serve the Governor, 2    the General Assembly, and the State Board. The State 3    Superintendent or his or her designee must serve as a 4    voting member and chairperson of the Panel. The State 5    Superintendent must appoint a vice chairperson from the 6    membership of the Panel. The Panel must advance 7    recommendations based on a three-fifths majority vote of 8    Panel members present and voting. A minority opinion may 9    also accompany any recommendation of the Panel. The Panel 10    shall be appointed by the State Superintendent, except as 11    otherwise provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection (i) 12    and include the following members: 13            (A) Two appointees that represent district 14        superintendents, recommended by a statewide 15        organization that represents district superintendents.16            (B) Two appointees that represent school boards, 17        recommended by a statewide organization that 18        represents school boards.19            (C) Two appointees from districts that represent 20        school business officials, recommended by a statewide 21        organization that represents school business 22        officials.23            (D) Two appointees that represent school 24        principals, recommended by a statewide organization 25        that represents school principals.26            (E) Two appointees that represent teachers,   HB3090- 74 -LRB104 09171 LNS 19227 b1        recommended by a statewide organization that 2        represents teachers.3            (F) Two appointees that represent teachers, 4        recommended by another statewide organization that 5        represents teachers.6            (G) Two appointees that represent regional 7        superintendents of schools, recommended by 8        organizations that represent regional superintendents.9            (H) Two independent experts selected solely by the 10        State Superintendent.11            (I) Two independent experts recommended by public 12        universities in this State.13            (J) One member recommended by a statewide 14        organization that represents parents.15            (K) Two representatives recommended by collective 16        impact organizations that represent major metropolitan 17        areas or geographic areas in Illinois.18            (L) One member from a statewide organization 19        focused on research-based education policy to support 20        a school system that prepares all students for 21        college, a career, and democratic citizenship. 22            (M) One representative from a school district 23        organized under Article 34 of this Code. 24        The State Superintendent shall ensure that the 25    membership of the Panel includes representatives from 26    school districts and communities reflecting the   HB3090- 75 -LRB104 09171 LNS 19227 b1    geographic, socio-economic, racial, and ethnic diversity 2    of this State. The State Superintendent shall additionally 3    ensure that the membership of the Panel includes 4    representatives with expertise in bilingual education and 5    special education. Staff from the State Board shall staff 6    the Panel. 7        (2) In addition to those Panel members appointed by 8    the State Superintendent, 4 members of the General 9    Assembly shall be appointed as follows: one member of the 10    House of Representatives appointed by the Speaker of the 11    House of Representatives, one member of the Senate 12    appointed by the President of the Senate, one member of 13    the House of Representatives appointed by the Minority 14    Leader of the House of Representatives, and one member of 15    the Senate appointed by the Minority Leader of the Senate. 16    There shall be one additional member appointed by the 17    Governor. All members appointed by legislative leaders or 18    the Governor shall be non-voting, ex officio members.19        (3) The Panel must study topics at the direction of 20    the General Assembly or State Board of Education, as 21    provided under paragraph (1). The Panel may also study the 22    following topics at the direction of the chairperson: 23            (A) The format and scope of annual spending plans 24        referenced in paragraph (9) of subsection (h) of this 25        Section.26            (B) The Comparable Wage Index under this Section.  HB3090- 76 -LRB104 09171 LNS 19227 b1            (C) Maintenance and operations, including capital 2        maintenance and construction costs.3            (D) "At-risk student" definition.4            (E) Benefits.5            (F) Technology.6            (G) Local Capacity Target.7            (H) Funding for Alternative Schools, Laboratory 8        Schools, safe schools, and alternative learning 9        opportunities programs.10            (I) Funding for college and career acceleration 11        strategies.12            (J) Special education investments. 13            (K) Early childhood investments, in collaboration 14        with the Illinois Early Learning Council.15        (4) (Blank). 16        (5) Within 5 years after the implementation of this 17    Section, and every 5 years thereafter, the Panel shall 18    complete an evaluative study of the entire Evidence-Based 19    Funding model, including an assessment of whether or not 20    the formula is achieving State goals. The Panel shall 21    report to the State Board, the General Assembly, and the 22    Governor on the findings of the study.23        (6) (Blank). 24        (7) To ensure that (i) the Adequacy Target calculation 25    under subsection (b) accurately reflects the needs of 26    students living in poverty or attending schools located in   HB3090- 77 -LRB104 09171 LNS 19227 b1    areas of high poverty, (ii) racial equity within the 2    Evidence-Based Funding formula is explicitly explored and 3    advanced, and (iii) the funding goals of the formula 4    distribution system established under this Section are 5    sufficient to provide adequate funding for every student 6    and to fully fund every school in this State, the Panel 7    shall review the Essential Elements under paragraph (2) of 8    subsection (b). The Panel shall consider all of the 9    following in its review:10            (A) The financial ability of school districts to 11        provide instruction in a foreign language to every 12        student and whether an additional Essential Element 13        should be added to the formula to ensure that every 14        student has access to instruction in a foreign 15        language.16            (B) The adult-to-student ratio for each Essential 17        Element in which a ratio is identified. The Panel 18        shall consider whether the ratio accurately reflects 19        the staffing needed to support students living in 20        poverty or who have traumatic backgrounds.21            (C) Changes to the Essential Elements that may be 22        required to better promote racial equity and eliminate 23        structural racism within schools.24            (D) The impact of investing $350,000,000 in 25        additional funds each year under this Section and an 26        estimate of when the school system will become fully   HB3090- 78 -LRB104 09171 LNS 19227 b1        funded under this level of appropriation.2            (E) Provide an overview of alternative funding 3        structures that would enable the State to become fully 4        funded at an earlier date.5            (F) The potential to increase efficiency and to 6        find cost savings within the school system to expedite 7        the journey to a fully funded system.8            (G) The appropriate levels for reenrolling and 9        graduating high-risk high school students who have 10        been previously out of school. These outcomes shall 11        include enrollment, attendance, skill gains, credit 12        gains, graduation or promotion to the next grade 13        level, and the transition to college, training, or 14        employment, with an emphasis on progressively 15        increasing the overall attendance.16            (H) The evidence-based or research-based practices 17        that are shown to reduce the gaps and disparities 18        experienced by African American students in academic 19        achievement and educational performance, including 20        practices that have been shown to reduce disparities 21        in disciplinary rates, drop-out rates, graduation 22        rates, college matriculation rates, and college 23        completion rates. 24        On or before December 31, 2021, the Panel shall report 25    to the State Board, the General Assembly, and the Governor 26    on the findings of its review. This paragraph (7) is   HB3090- 79 -LRB104 09171 LNS 19227 b1    inoperative on and after July 1, 2022.2        (8) On or before April 1, 2024, the Panel must submit a 3    report to the General Assembly on annual adjustments to 4    Glenwood Academy's base-funding minimum in a similar 5    fashion to school districts under this Section. 6    (j) References. Beginning July 1, 2017, references in 7other laws to general State aid funds or calculations under 8Section 18-8.05 of this Code (now repealed) shall be deemed to 9be references to evidence-based model formula funds or 10calculations under this Section. 11(Source: P.A. 102-33, eff. 6-25-21; 102-197, eff. 7-30-21; 12102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 102-699, eff. 4-19-22; 102-782, eff. 131-1-23; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-894, eff. 5-20-22; 103-8, 14eff. 6-7-23; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-175, eff. 6-30-23; 15103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-780, eff. 8-2-24; 103-802, eff. 161-1-25; revised 11-26-24.)